DI-32 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6X6-01

DTC |co226/2 1toco256/24 | ABS Solenoid Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This solenoid goes on when signals are received from the ECU and controls the pressure acting on the wheel
cylinders thus controlling the braking force.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0226/2 1 Openorshortcircuitin SFRH or SFRR circuit continues for * Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. * SFRH or SFRRcircuit

C0236 /22 Openorshortcircuitin SFLH or SFLR circuit continues for * Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. e SFLHor SFLRcircuit

C0246 /23 Openorshortcircuitin SRRH or SRRR circuit continues for ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. *SRRHorSRRRcircuit

C0256 / 24 Openorshortcircuitin SRLH or SRLR circuit continues for ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0.015sec.ormore. *SRLHor SRLRcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the actuator solenoid circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and pro-
hibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-33
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DI-34

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check hydraulic brake booster solenoid.

® LOCK

@

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each of terminals A48 - 4 and A50
-1,2,3,4,7,8,9and 10ofhydraulic brake booster connector.
OK:
Continuity
HINT:
Resistance ofeachsolenoidat20 °C (68 °F)
SFRH, SFLH,SRRH,SRLH:4.75 -5.25Q
SFRR, SFLR,SRRR,SRLR:2.00 -2.40Q

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster.

2 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA &
TRC & VSC ECU and actuator (See page IN-35).

@

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.
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